Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 1 Filing of Assumed Name

6-1-1.
Filing of business name required. [Effective until January 1, 2023.]

No person or persons shall carry on or conduct or transact business in this state under any assumed name, or under any designation, name, or style, corporate or otherwise, other than the real name or names of the individual or individuals conducting or transacting business, unless the person or persons shall file, in the office of the town or city clerk in the town or city in which the person or persons conduct or transact, or intend to conduct or transact, business, a certificate stating the name under which the business is, or is to be, conducted or transacted, and the true or real full name or names, both the first name and surname, of the person or persons conducting or transacting the business, with the post office address or addresses of the person or persons. The certificate shall be executed and sworn to by the person or persons so conducting or intending to conduct the business, before some person authorized to administer oaths.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 538, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 665, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 214, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 386, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-1-1

.

6-1-1.
Filing of business name required. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

No person or persons shall carry on or conduct or transact business in this state under any assumed name, or under any designation, name, or style, corporate or otherwise, other than the real name or names of the individual or individuals conducting or transacting business, unless the person or persons shall file, in person, by mail, or electronically with the office of the town or city clerk in the town or city in which the person or persons conduct or transact, or intend to conduct or transact, business, a certificate stating the name under which the business is, or is to be, conducted or transacted, and the true or real full name or names, both the first name and surname, of the person or persons conducting or transacting the business, with the post office address or addresses of the person or persons, and the email address of the person or persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 538, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 665, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 214, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 386, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-1-1

; P.L. 2022, ch. 237, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 238, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

6-1-2.
Indexes — Filing fee — Certified copies as evidence.

The several town and city clerks of this state shall keep alphabetical indexes of all persons filing certificates and of all names or styles assumed, referred to in this chapter, and, for the indexing and filing of the certificates, the town and city clerks shall receive for the benefit of the town or city a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) each. A copy of the certificate, duly certified to by the town or city clerk in whose office the certificate shall be filed, shall be presumptive evidence in all courts in this state of the facts contained in the certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 538, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 214, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 386, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-1-2

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 164, § 1.

6-1-3.
Corporations — Partnership names.

This chapter shall in no way affect or apply to any corporation or limited partnership duly organized under the laws of this state, or to any corporation or limited partnership organized under the laws of any other state and lawfully doing business in this state, or to any partnership or joint venture, the name or designation of which includes the true or real surname of at least one individual who is a partner or joint venturer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 538, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 214, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 386, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-1-3

; P.L. 1989, ch. 518, § 1.

6-1-4.
Penalty for violations.

Any person or persons carrying on, conducting, or transacting business as mentioned in this chapter who shall fail to comply with the provisions of this chapter shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year, or fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 538, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 214, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 386, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

6-1-4

.